California statutes. Education Code
The board shall set up an examination or shall evaluate the qualifications of vocational teachers desirous of qualifying for the baccalaureate degree. The evaluation shall be based upon the education, completion of approved vocational teacher training, occupational experience, supervisory experience, and managerial experience of the candidate. The board is authorized to recommend to state colleges the number of units to be allowed towards a baccalaureate degree, but shall not recommend that a candidate be granted more than 40 units for occupational experience, supervisory experience and managerial experience. The evaluation shall be at the discretion of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89222.

On the basis of the examination and an evaluation of the candidate’s experience and other qualifications made by the board, the board shall recommend the granting of a baccalaureate degree in vocational arts by the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

89223.

Any candidate for a baccalaureate degree shall be a high school graduate, shall have had not less than seven years actual experience in the trade or occupation in which he desires to qualify, and shall have had a minimum of 1,620 hours teaching experience in an approved vocational class, or 1,000 hours teaching experience in an approved trade extension class.

In lieu of the educational qualifications, the board may evaluate and make recommendations concerning such other qualifications as it deems applicable for persons lacking the formal educational qualifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Online Education [89225. - 89226.]

89225.

For purposes of measuring the effectiveness of online education as a tool in systemwide efforts toward degree or certificate completion, the trustees shall establish a series of uniform definitions for online education. The definitions developed by the trustees under this section shall, at a minimum, include a systemwide definition for an online course where the course can be entirely completed remotely.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 524, Sec. 3.   (AB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

89226.

(a) On or before January 15, 2019, and on or before January 15 every two years thereafter, the trustees shall report to the Legislature key performance data on state-supported online courses as defined in Section 89225, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of students enrolled at each campus.

(2) Course completion rates for courses other than online courses.

(3) Completion rates for degree programs that include no online courses.

(4) Grade point average for students enrolled in online courses.

(5) The number of students (full-time equivalent and headcount) cross-enrolled in online courses at a California State University campus other than the campus at which they are matriculated.

(6) Course completion rates for students enrolled in online courses.

(7) Completion rates for degree programs that include online courses.

(8) Student enrollment (full-time equivalent and headcount) in all state-supported online courses, disaggregated by undergraduate and graduate students, as well as by campus.

(9) Cross-campus online enrollment (full-time equivalent) by host campus.

(10) Successful course completion rates in cross-campus
 online courses.

(11) Courses completed by cross-enrolled online students, specifying the type of academic credit they received, including lower division, upper division, or graduate level.

(b) Student enrollment and completion rate data included in a report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be made available by demographics, including age, gender, and ethnicity.

(c) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on July 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) The report prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 524, Sec. 4.   (AB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Instructionally Related Activities [89230. - 89230.]

89230.

“Instructionally related activities” means those activities and laboratory experiences that are at least partially sponsored by an academic discipline or department and that are, in the judgment of the president of a particular campus, with the approval of the trustees, integrally related to its formal instructional offerings.

Activities that are considered to be essential to a quality educational program and an important instructional experience for any student enrolled in the respective program may be considered instructionally related activities.

Instructionally related activities include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Intercollegiate athletics: costs that are necessary for a basic competitive program including equipment and supplies and scheduled travel, not provided by the state. Athletic grants should not be included.

(b) Radio, television, film: costs related to the provisions of basic “hands-on” experience not provided by the state. Purchase or rental of films as instructional aids shall not be included.

(c) Music and dance performance: costs to provide experience in individual and group performance, including recitals, before audiences and in settings sufficiently varied to familiarize students with the performance facet of the field.

(d) Theatre and musical productions: basic support of theatrical and operatic activities sufficient to permit experience not only in actual performance, but in production, direction, set design, and other elements considered a part of professional training in these fields.

(e) Art exhibits: support for student art shows given in connection with degree programs.

(f) Publications: the costs to support and operate basic publication programs including a periodic newspaper and other laboratory experience basic to journalism and literary training. Additional publications designed primarily to inform or entertain shall not be included.

(g) Forensics: activities designed to provide experience in debate, public speaking, and related programs, including travel required for a competitive debate program.

(h) Other activities: activities associated with other instructional areas that are consistent with purposes included in the above may be added as they are identified.

Pursuant to this section and other provisions of this code, the Chancellor of the California State University shall develop a program of fiscal support and shall consult with the California State Student Association, the Academic Senate, and the Chancellor’s Council of Presidents regarding the program.

This section shall not become operative unless funds are appropriated to meet the instructionally related needs of the campuses of the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 69.   Effective October 11, 2001.   Section is conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Athletic Programs [89240. - 89241.]

89240.

It is the intent of the Legislature that opportunities for participation in athletics be provided on as nearly an equal basis to male and female students as is practicable, and that comparable incentives and encouragements be offered to females to engage in athletics.

It is the further intent of the Legislature that females be given the same opportunity to participate in athletics and compete with other females in individual and team athletics as is available to males who participate with other males in individual and team athletics.

(History: Enacted by Stats, 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89241.

(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the California Student Athlete Fair Opportunity Act of 2005.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the Trustees of the California State University provide appropriate academic support services for student athletes and that those athletes are given a fair opportunity to earn a baccalaureate degree.

(c) The trustees shall ensure, through executive order or regulation, that all California State University campuses that provide athletic scholarships for student athletes also provide summer athletic scholarships commencing with the 2006 summer term. The provision of these summer athletic scholarships shall be consistent with both of the following:

(1) The requirements of Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972, as amended from time to time.

(2) The bylaws of the National Collegiate Athletic Association, as amended from time to time.

(d) Students who are otherwise ineligible for admission to the specific campus of the California State University, but who are admitted under policies that permit those students to be admitted if they have athletic ability that will contribute to the campus, shall be given first priority for summer athletic scholarship assistance.

(e) (1) Summer athletic scholarships awarded pursuant to this section shall, at a minimum, be sufficient to cover the cost of tuition, fees, books, and supplies as calculated for purposes of the summer cost of attendance under the provisions of Title IV of the federal Education Act of 1965, as it is amended from time to time.

(2) Nothing in this part shall be construed to limit a summer athletic scholarship awarded pursuant to this section to any amount less than that which is allowed under the bylaws of the National Collegiate Athletic Association.

(3) A summer athletic scholarship awarded pursuant to this section shall be of sufficient amount and duration with regard to the number of summer sessions and the number of units covered, to provide a student athlete a fair opportunity to correct academic progress problems through attendance in a summer session.

(f) A summer athletic scholarship awarded pursuant to this section may be funded through any revenue source available to, or procured by, the campuses of the California State University, including, but not necessarily limited to, gate receipts, donations from alumni and others, corporate sponsorships, associated student contributions, and campus-based student fees that may be legally used for this purpose. In accordance with subdivision (i), the California State University shall not use state General Fund moneys or state university fee revenue to fund summer athletic scholarships. The California State University shall not set aside, for the purposes of summer athletic scholarships, any institutional financial aid funds for which any financially needy students are eligible. A student athlete may only receive summer financial aid assistance if that student athlete otherwise qualifies for that assistance irrespective of his or her status as a student athlete.

(g) (1) The trustees shall ensure, through executive order or regulation, that all California State University campuses that are members of the National Collegiate Athletic Association have a comprehensive plan for the academic support of student athletes.

(2) The plan adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the requirements of Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972, as amended from time to time, and the bylaws of the National Collegiate Athletic Association, as amended from time to time. This plan shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, coordination with existing academic and financial support services at the campus, evaluation of the academic needs of student athletes, a set of academic support initiatives, a financing plan for these initiatives and a fund-raising strategy for the augmentation of these initiatives, and a regular evaluation mechanism to monitor the academic progress of athletes and the effectiveness of academic support programs.

(3) Services provided under this subdivision may include any of the following:

(A) Additional athletic financial assistance, which covers an amount up to the cost of attendance under the provisions of Title IV of the federal Education Act of 1965, as amended from time to time, for additional periods of attendance necessary for an athlete to complete the requirements for a baccalaureate degree after the student’s period of athletic eligibility has ended.

(B) Employment assistance, including work study programs.

(C) Tutoring.

(D) Mentoring.

(E) Accommodations in the scheduling of class sections to provide a fair opportunity for student athletes to attend required courses in a manner that allows them to participate in the requirements of their sports.

(h) (1) The trustees shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on or before November 1, 2006, and subsequently on or before November 1 of each odd-numbered year, commencing on November 1, 2007, regarding the status of athletic academic progress and athletic academic support in the California State University system for all campuses that are members of the National Collegiate Athletic Association.

(2) If any data that are required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (3) could yield an individual identification of an athlete, or if any data or information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (3) could be considered to be of a proprietary nature as related to the sports enterprise of the campus, those data may be forwarded under separate cover to the Governor and to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature with a request for confidentiality.

(3) The report required by this subdivision shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) A five-year history of the graduation rate and Academic Progress Rate of each team on each campus as calculated by the National Collegiate Athletic Association, to the extent these rates are available.

(B) Annual admission category information for each team on each campus that indicates the number and percent of students admitted who were not eligible for regular admission to the campus or the university.

(C) A summary of the academic initiatives and support programs available to the athletes at each campus.

(D) If the campus participates in Division I, including any of its subparts, of the National Collegiate Athletic Association, and if any team or the athletic program overall has an Academic Progress Rate score of less than 925 for any year, a summary of the corrective action planned by the campus or athletic department as well as a report on sanctions, if any, imposed by the National Collegiate Athletic Association.

(E) The total budget for the athletic programs and each team, including an itemization of the amount spent on athletic scholarships and the amount spent on summer athletic scholarships.

(i) The California State University shall not encumber, for the purposes of this section, any moneys from the state General Fund or any state university fee revenue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 140.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. California State University Educational Opportunity Program [89250. - 89258.]

89250.

This article shall be known as the California State University Educational Opportunity Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89251.

There is a state student assistance program known as the State University Educational Opportunity Program. It is the purpose of the program to provide educational assistance and grants for undergraduate study at the California State University to students who are economically disadvantaged or educationally and economically disadvantaged, but who display potential for success in accredited curricula offered by the California State University.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following applies:

(a) “Educational agency” means an agency, other than a federal agency, which is supported in whole or in part by funds appropriated for educational purposes.

(b) “State agency” means every state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, and commission.

(c) “Trustees” means the Trustees of the California State University.

(d) The residence of a recipient shall be determined in accordance with the rules for determining residence prescribed by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 68000) of Part 41 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 89700) of Chapter 6 of Part 52.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89252.

California State University Educational Opportunity Program grants may be awarded to persons selected for enrollment in programs authorized by the trustees according to the procedures established by the trustees. A person selected for a grant shall be a resident of this state, shall be a high school graduate or have, pursuant to the procedures, equivalent qualifications, and shall have been nominated by his or her high school or community college, the Veterans Administration, a state agency or educational agency designated by the trustees, or a state university president. The trustees shall determine eligibility for grants awarded pursuant to this article. The grants may be granted and renewed according to standards set by the trustees until the student has received a baccalaureate degree or has completed five academic years, whichever occurs first. In special circumstances, as in the case of illness, military service, or family hardship, the trustees may renew the grant beyond the fifth year of study, provided the student has not received a baccalaureate degree. When the recipient is an enrollee in a special educational opportunity program approved by the trustees, for the purposes of this article, the state university sponsoring the program shall receive from the trustees reimbursement of up to sixty dollars ($60) per month per enrollee up to 12 months’ support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89253.

Grants shall be provided for students who display potential for success in accredited curricula offered by the California State University, but lack the necessary funds to pay for tuition, books, and room and board, provided the students meet the standards of the state university that they are attending or the requirements for the special admissions program established by the trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89254.

Grants awarded pursuant to this article shall be in an amount sufficient to pay the costs of a student, during his or her course of study, for tuition, books, and room and board in accordance with his or her needs as shall be determined by the trustees. No student shall be awarded a grant in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per academic year. The trustees shall require that each applicant for a grant pursuant to this chapter also make prior or concurrent application for a federal basic educational opportunity grant, unless the trustees are satisfied that the applicant is not eligible for that federal grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89255.

The amount of the grant awarded pursuant to Section 89254 may be increased above the maximum amount specified in that section to the extent that the Legislature expressly makes funds available for purposes of this section in the budget for that fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89256.

Each high school or community college in this state may nominate to the trustees students it deems deserving of the grants made available under this article. The trustees shall compile a list of students so nominated from which it may select students for grants in accordance with standards set by the trustees pursuant to this article. The Veterans Administration, any state agency, or educational agency designated by the trustees, or any president of a California State University may nominate persons whom they deem eligible for the grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89257.

Records of the academic progress of each student attending a campus of the California State University under a grant shall be kept by each campus of the California State University having a program and forwarded to the trustees in order that the program created by this article may be evaluated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89258.

Each campus of the California State University may submit plans for a special educational opportunity program for approval by the trustees. Each program qualifying shall be authorized a program director and may be authorized as many special qualified counselors and advisers and the related operating and equipment support as is appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Kenneth L. Maddy Institute [89260. - 89260.5.]

89260.

(a) The Kenneth L. Maddy Institute is hereby established as a part of California State University, Fresno, to be administered by the president of that campus, and organized as a nonprofit organization under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code. The Kenneth L. Maddy Institute shall provide training for leadership in government, and shall prepare students and elected officials for public service in the tradition established by The Honorable Kenneth L. Maddy during his more than 25 years of service to the citizens of California.

(b) The Kenneth L. Maddy Institute shall operate under the name “Kenneth L. Maddy Institute” or, when appropriate, under the name “The Maddy Institute.” The Kenneth L. Maddy Institute shall operate through, and be governed by, a board of trustees pursuant to its organization under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code. The President of California State University, Fresno, shall be a member of that board of trustees. The board of trustees may establish committees, and delegate authority to those committees, as it deems appropriate.

(c) An executive director shall be responsible for implementing the mission of the institute and supervising its daily operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 463, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

89260.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the institute provide public leadership training in two primary areas:

(a) Students nearing completion of the requirements for a bachelor of arts degree or for a master’s degree shall be eligible for internships with local, state, and federal government officials without regard to political party affiliation. The internship experience shall provide students with the opportunity to develop public leadership skills while gaining practical knowledge of the day-to-day operations of government and the political process.

(b) The institute shall develop and sponsor seminars, extension courses, and symposia on topics directly related to public administration in local and state government. The institute shall serve as a nonpartisan training center to provide elected officials with practical, intensive, and convenient instruction in topics such as public finance, staff administration, budget planning, drafting of legislation, and the legislative process. The institute shall issue certificates for completion of course and program modules.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

89260.5.

Instruction at the institute shall be provided primarily by the California State University, Fresno, supplemented by frequent, in-depth discussions with active and retired appointed and elected public officials, and shall include an oral history element. It is the intent of the Legislature that the institute shall specifically seek to sponsor regular roundtable discussions among experienced elected officials on topics related to public administration, emerging public policy, and legislation in their areas of government service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 463, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.7. Baccalaureate Degree Nursing Programs [89267. - 89267.5.]

89267.

It is the intent of the Legislature:

(a) That, pursuant to funding to be appropriated in the Budget Act of 2007, the trustees should increase, by at least 340, the number of full-time equivalent students in baccalaureate degree nursing programs, beginning in the 2007–08 fiscal year.

(b) That the trustees provide a report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before March 15, 2007, on the proposed expenditure plans to expand nursing programs to enroll an additional 340 full-time equivalent students as a result of the funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 2007.

(c) To support the expansion of future baccalaureate degree nursing enrollment with annual appropriations in the State Budget Act.

(d) That the funding for the baccalaureate degree enrollment expansions referenced in this section be funded within the general enrollment growth funding that is traditionally provided to the California State University during the annual state budget process.

(e) To encourage the university, in providing programs under this article, to establish partnerships or collaborations with community colleges to facilitate the education of students in bachelor of the science of nursing (BSN) or entry-level master’s nursing programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 522, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

89267.3.

The California State University may establish priorities for admission to baccalaureate degree nursing programs, but it shall not disqualify or prohibit any student who possesses a baccalaureate or higher degree from enrolling in, and completing, a baccalaureate degree nursing program on the sole basis of that student’s possession of the degree.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 522, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

89267.5.

(a) As used in this section, “ADN-to-BSN student” means a person who meets all of the following qualifications:

(1) The person has earned an associate degree in nursing from a California Community College from a program approved by the Board of Registered Nursing.

(2) The person is licensed to work in California as a registered nurse.

(3) The person is applying to the California State University to earn a bachelor of science in nursing.

(b) Prior to the commencement of the 2012–13 academic year, the Chancellor of the California
 State University shall implement articulated nursing degree transfer pathways between the California Community Colleges and the California State University. The articulated nursing degree transfer pathways shall, at a minimum, comply with both of the following requirements:

(1) A campus of the California State University shall not require an ADN-to-BSN student to complete any duplicative courses for which the content is already required by the Board of Registered Nursing for licensure or that the student has already satisfied by earning the associate degree in nursing and becoming licensed as a registered nurse.

(2) A campus of the California State University shall not require an ADN-to-BSN student, who has taken a prerequisite course at a California community college to earn the associate degree in nursing, to take the same prerequisite course or same content from that
 prerequisite course at the university for the bachelor of science in nursing degree.

(c) The Chancellor of the California State University and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may appoint representatives from their respective institutions to work collaboratively to provide advice and assistance on either or both of the following:

(1) Implementation of the articulated nursing degree transfer pathways.

(2) Identification of additional components to be included that are consistent with providing ADN-to-BSN students with a streamlined nursing degree transfer pathway consistent with the finding in subdivision (g) of Section 1 of Chapter 283 of the Statutes of 2009.

(d) By March 15, 2011, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall prepare and
 submit to the Legislature and the Governor a report on the status of plans to implement articulated nursing degree transfer pathways between the California Community Colleges and the California State University. This report may be part of its annual budget report to the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 59.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Cybersecurity Regional Alliances and Multistakeholder Partnerships Pilot Program [89270. - 89270.]

89270.

(a) The Cybersecurity Regional Alliances and Multistakeholder Partnerships Pilot Program is hereby established in order to address the cybersecurity workforce gap by doing all of the following:

(1) Stimulating cybersecurity education and workforce development by bringing together stakeholders in the cybersecurity ecosystem.

(2) Aligning the cybersecurity workforce needs of employers with the education and training provided by institutions of higher education.

(3) Increasing the pipeline of students pursuing cybersecurity careers.

(4) Developing the cybersecurity
 workforce to meet industry needs within local or regional economies.

(b) On or before March 1, 2023, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall develop an application process, selection process, and criteria for California State University campuses seeking to participate in the pilot program. Preference shall be given to California State University campuses that have or are developing regional pipeline programs in cybersecurity with the California Community Colleges.

(c) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall select any number of campuses to participate in the pilot program.

(d) Each selected California State University campus shall do all of the following:

(1) Create a pilot program with goals
 and metrics.

(2) Develop strategies and tactics for building successful regional alliances and multistakeholder partnerships.

(3) Measure the impact and results of its pilot program and annually share the impact and results with the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(e) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall annually report the impact and results from each selected campus’s pilot program to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) On or before July 1, 2028, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall submit a comprehensive report on the pilot program to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall include all of the following:

(A) Recommendations on how to improve the pilot program.

(B) Data on enrollment in the pilot program.

(C) Data on how many different groups of people
 have been served by the pilot program.

(D) Data on the number of veterans that have participated in the pilot program.

(E) Recommendations on how to recruit more veterans to participate in the pilot program.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on July 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 117, Sec. 1.   (AB 569)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Doctor of Nursing Practice Degree Program [89280. - 89281.]

89280.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 66010.4, in order to meet specific nursing education needs in California, the California State University may establish Doctor of Nursing Practice degree programs.

(b) The Doctor of Nursing Practice degree offered by the California State University shall be distinguished from the doctor of philosophy degrees in nursing offered at, or in conjunction with, the University of California.

(c) Doctor of Nursing Practice degree programs offered by the California State University shall focus on the preparation of nursing faculty to teach in postsecondary nursing education programs and may also train nurses for advanced nursing practice or nurse leadership, or
 both.

(d) Doctor of Nursing Practice degree programs established by the California State University are not exempt from any required review and approval processes.

(e) Enrollments in Doctor of Nursing Practice programs shall not alter the California State University’s ratio of graduate instruction to total enrollment, and shall not diminish enrollment growth in university undergraduate programs.

(f) The California State University shall provide any initial funding needed for Doctor of Nursing Practice programs authorized by this article from within existing budgets for academic programs support, without diminishing the quality of program support offered to California State University undergraduate programs. It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University seek private donations or other
 nonstate funds to fund startup costs for Doctor of Nursing Practice degree programs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 702, Sec. 2.   (AB 422)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

89281.

The California State University shall permit students enrolled in the Doctor of Nursing Practice Degree Pilot Program established pursuant to this article, as it read on December 31, 2017, to complete their coursework on and after January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 702, Sec. 2.   (AB 422)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Expenditures for Undergraduate and Graduate Instruction and Research Activities [89290. - 89291.]

89290.

(a) The California State University shall report biennially to the Legislature and the Department of Finance, on or before October 1, 2014, and on or before October 1 of each even-numbered year thereafter, on the total costs of education at the California State University.

(b) The report prepared under this section shall identify the costs of undergraduate education, graduate academic education, graduate professional education, and research activities. All four categories listed in this subdivision shall be reported in total and disaggregated separately by health sciences disciplines, disciplines included in paragraph (16) of subdivision (b) of Section 89295, and all other disciplines. The university shall also separately
 report on the cost of education for postbaccalaureate teacher education programs. For purposes of this report, research for which a student earns credit toward his or her degree program shall be identified as undergraduate education or graduate education, as appropriate.

(c) The costs shall also be reported by fund source, including all of the following:

(1) State General Fund.

(2) Systemwide tuition and fees.

(3) Nonresident tuition and fees and other student fees.

(d) For any report submitted under this section before January 1, 2017, the costs shall, at a minimum, be reported on a systemwide basis. For any report submitted under this section on or after January 1, 2017, the costs shall
 be reported on both a systemwide and campus-by-campus basis.

(e) A report prepared under this section on or after January 1, 2017, shall include information on costs, disaggregated by campus, based on the methodology developed by the National Association of College and University Business Officers in its February 2002 report, Explaining College Costs, and other methodologies determined by the university.

(f) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report under this section shall be inoperative on January 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 24.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

89291.

The Office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall prepare a systemwide report that includes a summary of current hiring practices for all California State University positions, including executive, management, faculty, and nonfaculty support staff positions. The systemwide report shall compare hiring practices at the California State University to the best practices for hiring persons to similar positions at the University of California and the California Community Colleges. The chancellor’s office shall submit the systemwide report to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, and the Department of Finance on or before March 31, 2019, and on or before March 31 of each academic year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (AB 2505)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Reporting of Performance Measures [89295. - 89295.]

89295.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) The “four-year graduation rate” means the percentage of a cohort of undergraduate students who entered the university as freshmen at any campus and graduated from any campus within four years.

(2) The “six-year graduation rate” means the percentage of a cohort of undergraduate students who entered the university as freshmen at any campus and graduated from any campus within six years.

(3) The “two-year transfer graduation rate” means the percentage of a cohort of undergraduate students who entered the university at any campus as junior-level transfer
 students from the California Community Colleges and graduated from any campus within two years.

(4) The “three-year transfer graduation rate” means the percentage of a cohort of undergraduate students who entered the university at any campus as junior-level transfer students from the California Community Colleges and graduated from any campus within three years.

(5) The “four-year transfer graduation rate” means the percentage of a cohort of undergraduate students who entered the university at any campus as junior-level transfer students from the California Community Colleges and graduated from any campus within four years.

(6) “Low-income student” means an undergraduate student who has an expected family contribution, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 69432.7, at any time during the student’s matriculation at